Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-128
Legislative intent; department review of credentialed professions and businesses.

(1) It is the intent of the Legislature that quality health care services and human services be provided to the public and basic standards be developed to protect the public health and safety and that professions be regulated by the state only when it is demonstrated that such regulation is in the best interests of the public.

(2) The department shall periodically review each credentialed profession and business to determine if continued credentialing is needed to protect the public.

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 8;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,343;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 28.